District of Columbia statutes.
8-101.05g

Orders.

(a)

If the Mayor determines that a hazardous condition exists that may endanger the health or safety of the residents or property, or the environment in the District due to a person’s noncompliance with this part or a regulation promulgated pursuant to this part, the Mayor may issue a cease and desist order requiring the person to cease operations immediately or to otherwise cease noncompliance with this part or a regulation promulgated pursuant to this part.

(b)

If the Mayor has reason to believe that there has been a violation of this part or a regulation promulgated pursuant to this part, the Mayor may issue a compliance order requiring a violator to take action to come into compliance with this part or a regulation promulgated pursuant to this part and to take such measures as may be necessary to remedy a hazardous condition.

Mar. 15, 1985, D.C. Law 5-165, § 5g
as added Sept. 9, 2014, D.C. Law 20-135, § 101(b), 61 DCR 6767